District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.03

District life insurance benefits.

The District shall provide the group life insurance benefits set forth in § 1-622.07 to all employees of the District first employed after September 30, 1987, except those specifically excluded by law or by rule.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2203
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079
1981 Ed., § 1-623.3.
This section is referenced in § 1-610.63, § 1-622.16, and § 1-702.